Alabama, session 2026rs, SB300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the Senator Michael A. Figures Act.
Section 2. Section 32-6-300, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§32-6-300
(a) Owners of all motor vehicles who are residents of
Alabama, upon application to the judge of probate or
commissioner of licenses, complying with the state motor
vehicle laws relating to registration and licensing of motor
vehicles and payment of the regular license fee for plates as
provided by law for the motor vehicle, and the payment of an
additional annual fee of twenty dollars ($20), shall be issued
license plates which shall consist of a white background; bear
the words "Helping Schools." in red lettering; and contain a
drawing of a red apple, green book, and yellow ruler.
(b) The plates shall be issued, printed, and processed
in the same manner as other personalized plates are in this
chapter. The plates shall be valid for five years and shall be
replaced at the end of the period with either conventional
Page 1

replaced at the end of the period with either conventional
SB300 Enrolled
plates or other personalized plates, or with new "Helping
Schools" plates. Payment of the required motor vehicle license
fees and taxes for the years during which a new vehicle
license plate is not issued shall be evidenced as provided for
in Section 32-6-63. The State Department of Revenue shall
design, or have designed, design of the "Helping Schools"
plates shall be made in compliance with all laws and
regulations.
(c) For the registration year beginning January 1,
2027, only, an individual in possession of a "Helping Schools"
plate that was bought or renewed during the period of March 1,
2025, to December 31, 2026, the Department of Revenue shall
issue a new "Helping Schools" plate that meets the design
requirements of this section, and shall not charge a fee for
the replacement plate."
Section 3. This act shall become effective on January
1, 2027.
Page 2

1, 2027.
SB300 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB300
Senate 25-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate, as amended.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 07-Apr-26




By: Senator Figures
Page 3